Hawaii statutes.
§480-2 Unfair competition, practices,
declared unlawful. (a) Unfair methods of competition and unfair or
deceptive acts or practices in the conduct of any trade or commerce are
unlawful.

(b) In construing this section, the courts and
the office of consumer protection shall give due consideration to the rules,
regulations, and decisions of the Federal Trade Commission and the federal
courts interpreting section 5(a)(1) of the Federal Trade Commission Act (15
U.S.C. 45(a)(1)), as from time to time amended.

(c) No showing that the proceeding or suit
would be in the public interest (as these terms are interpreted under section
5(b) of the Federal Trade Commission Act) is necessary in any action brought
under this section.

(d) No person other than a consumer, the
attorney general or the director of the office of consumer protection may bring
an action based upon unfair or deceptive acts or practices declared unlawful by
this section.

(e) Any person may bring an action based on
unfair methods of competition declared unlawful by this section. [L 1965, c
129, pt of §1; Supp, §205A-1.1; HRS §480-2; am L 1987, c 274, §2; am L 1988, c
51, §1; am L 2002, c 229, §2]

Law Journals and Reviews

Misrepresentation and Deception Under Section 480-2 of the
Hawaii Revised Statutes. 10 HBJ 69.

Updating Unfair or Deceptive Acts and Practices Under
Chapter 480-2. 10 HBJ No. 13, at pg. 109.

What Can the Abolition of Slavery Teach Us About Climate
Change? Local Action in the Liquefied Natural Gas Controversy. 35 UH L. Rev.
687 (2013).

Case Notes

Requires showing that suit in public interest; may be proven
by knowledge of illegality. 732 F.2d 1403.

Employer's negligent misrepresentation that it guaranteed
employees full payment of their pensions was not "unfair act". 804
F.2d 1418.

Neither contractor association's collective bargaining
representation nor its fee for representation were unfair or deceptive acts.
809 F.2d 626.

Section does not apply to claims arising from securities
transactions. 849 F.2d 388; 758 F. Supp. 1357.

Violated where pawn shop created "likelihood of
confusion" by soliciting borrowers while disguising loans as sales. 3
F.3d 1261.

Court erred in finding this section preempted, where court
dismissed claim that issuer of title insurance policy violated this section.
95 F.3d 791.

Plaintiff filed class action claiming that defendant marketed
annuities through deceptive practices in violation of Hawaii's deceptive
practices act. There are no individualized issues of subjective reliance under
Hawaii law, thus, district court erred in denying class certification. 594
F.3d 1087 (2010).

Bankruptcy court's finding that appellee lenders' improper
postponement of the foreclosure sale of appellant debtor's property was a deceptive
practice under this section affirmed; inter alia, the bankruptcy court's
determination that improper postponement of this sort would deceive a
reasonable consumer was not clearly erroneous. 674 F.3d 1083 (2012).

Where complaints alleged that credit card providers violated
this section and §§480-13.5 and 481A-3 and unjust enrichment, the claims were
not preempted by the National Bank Act. Also, because the complaints
unambiguously disclaimed class status, the actions could not be removed under
the Class Action Fairness Act of 2005. 761 F.3d 1027 (2014).

Where complaints asserted that the attorney general brought
the actions under subsection (d) and §661-10, the state procedural devices were
not similar to an action under rule 23 of the federal rules of civil
procedure. 761 F.3d 1027 (2014).

A borrower need only allege that a lender has breached its
statutory duty not to engage in "unfair or deceptive acts or practices in
the conduct of any trade or commerce" in a way that caused private damages
in order to state a claim under this section and §480-13. 761 F.3d 1046
(2014).

District courts evaluating whether a borrower's complaint
states a claim under this section and §480-13 against a lender need only
address whether the complaint adequately alleges that the lender used unfair or
deceptive acts in its relationship with the borrower, without looking to
negligence law to determine whether the lender breached a common law duty of
care. 761 F.3d 1046 (2014).

Attachment available only where contract at issue also
establishes a debtor-creditor relationship for payment of money. 485 F. Supp.
1015.

Inability to establish antitrust claim does not prevent
establishment under this section; plaintiffs may recover for violations which
occurred prior to four year statute of limitations if they can prove fraudulent
concealment; practice is unfair when it offends public policy and when the
practice is immoral, unethical, oppressive, unscrupulous, or substantially
injurious to consumers; §480-13 creates private right of action. 491 F. Supp.
1199.

Plaintiffs could show that violation of federal or state
securities laws satisfies public interest requirement to bring suit under this
section. 501 F. Supp. 830.

Continuance of unlawful pricing program in contravention of
court order is as a matter of law, an unfair method of competition. 513 F.
Supp. 726.

Action by shopping center tenant against shopping center
owner. 530 F. Supp. 499.

Plaintiffs' state law claims, alleging violation of chapter
480 and common law fraud, to the extent they were premised on Truth in Lending
Act (TILA) or Regulation Z violations, including defendant's alleged failure to
properly disclose certain terms in its documents as required by TILA, were
preempted; the remaining state law claims were not preempted. 647 F. Supp. 2d
1208 (2008).

Plaintiff's claim for violation of this section was preempted
by federal copyright law. 673 F. Supp. 2d 1144 (2009).

Defendant's motion to dismiss count of complaint alleging
unfair methods of competition denied, where defendant argued that the count
must be dismissed, because, as a matter of law, defendant's alleged breaches of
the subject agreements did not, without more, constitute unfair methods of
competition under this section. 679 F. Supp. 2d 1203 (2009).

There was no basis for any unfair or deceptive act or
practice claim against defendant mortgage servicer, where evidence established
that defendant responded in a timely manner to almost every one of plaintiff's
numerous written requests for information, and when given the opportunity,
defendant investigated plaintiff's claims. Even assuming a question of fact
existed as to whether any acts of defendant were misleading or deceptive,
plaintiff had no evidence of actual damages resulting from any such act. 948
F. Supp. 2d 1086 (2013).

Plaintiff had not sufficiently pleaded the competition
requirement explained in Hawaii Medical Association, where plaintiff merely
alleged that defendants "operate within the healthcare services
industry" without providing any allegations as to the nature of the
competition between plaintiff and either defendant. 948 F. Supp. 2d 1131
(2013).

Preempted by federal labor regulations. 687 F. Supp. 1453.

Suit for causes of action which arose prior to amendment is
not precluded. 691 F. Supp. 247.

Minority shareholder of a corporation is not a consumer; no
private cause of action for unfair methods of competition. 700 F. Supp. 1056.

Although distributor corporation had standing to bring unfair
competition claim, shareholders were not "consumers" with standing to
sue under deceptive practices clause. 775 F. Supp. 1329.

Section inapplicable to insurance business. 795 F. Supp.
1036.

As a business, plaintiff had standing to sue for unfair
competition under this section. 808 F. Supp. 736.

Plaintiff corporation lacked standing to sue for deceptive
practices under chapter 480; plaintiffs, shareholders and officers of
corporation, lacked standing to sue for deceptive practices, where harm
suffered by plaintiffs arose indirectly as a result of harm done to
corporation. 895 F. Supp. 1365.

Plaintiff had standing to bring its §480-2 claim for unfair
methods of competition; plaintiff's likelihood of confusion allegations may
support both §§480-2 unfair methods of competition and 481A [sic] deceptive
acts or practices claims. 945 F. Supp. 1344.

Hawaii supreme court would find that plaintiff, a third-party
beneficiary of insurance contract between defendant insurer and a consumer, had
standing to bring a deceptive acts or practices claim pursuant to this
section. 947 F. Supp. 429.

Because defendant wholesale food marketer and distributor did
not meet definition of a consumer, it lacked standing to sue for deceptive
practices under this section. 61 F. Supp. 2d 1092.

Plaintiffs' unfair or deceptive acts or practices claims
dismissed; this section and §480-13 do not provide a cause of action for
personal injury claims. 100 F. Supp. 2d 1265.

A technical violation of Truth In Lending Act (TILA) does not
constitute a per se violation of this section. The technical violation of TILA
at issue, i.e., the failure to provide a properly dated notice of right to
cancel, did not qualify as an unfair act or practice. 101 F. Supp. 2d 1326.

A municipality may be held liable under this chapter if its
act is done "in the conduct of any trade or commerce", but is not
subject to a treble damage penalty. 215 F. Supp. 2d 1098.

Where the dispute giving rise to a claim for unfair and
deceptive act in trade or commerce occurred after the alleged injury, when
plaintiff alleged that defendant failed to comply with their agreement
regarding the release of plaintiff's medical records, plaintiff lacked standing
as a consumer to bring a claim under this section, and defendant was not
engaged in trade or commerce. 383 F. Supp. 2d 1244.

Plaintiff's claim under this section failed, where the
statute of limitations barred any unlawful business practice claim that
occurred prior to the four-year limitation period and although the additional
alleged occurrences would not be time-barred, plaintiff's asserted damages
flowing from the violation were unrecoverable because they were speculative.
522 F. Supp. 2d 1272.

While plaintiff may not recover under both the unfair and
deceptive trade practices statute and the federal Truth in Lending Act, not all
allegations stemming from the same set of facts necessarily implicate the same
matter. 707 F. Supp. 2d 1080.

Parts of plaintiff's unfair and deceptive trade practices
claim were not preempted by federal law where complaint alleged that defendant
had a general duty applicable to a contract, and not a duty created by federal
statute or regulation. 707 F. Supp. 2d 1080 (2010).

Unfair and deceptive trade practices sufficiently alleged
where defendant's agent made false representations, defendant improperly
prepared loan documents for two separate transactions, and defendant entered
into a transaction with plaintiff. 707 F. Supp. 2d 1080 (2010).

While plaintiff may not recover under both the unfair and
deceptive trade practices statute and the federal Truth in Lending Act, not all
allegations stemming from the same set of facts necessarily implicate the same
matter. 707 F. Supp. 2d 1080 (2010).

Plaintiff's investment was for business purposes where
plaintiff created plaintiff's own venture, plaintiff's investors were relying
on plaintiff to provide them with profit, and plaintiff acted as plaintiff's
own broker; plaintiff's investment under this chapter not a "personal
investment", and therefore plaintiff did not satisfy definition of
"consumer" pursuant to this chapter. 710 F. Supp. 2d 1036 (2010).

Because the language contained in this section is similar to
California's statute, and since plaintiff appears to base plaintiff's claim on
"fraudulent concealment", plaintiff was required to plead plaintiff's
unfair and deceptive trade practices claim with specificity; defendants' motion
to dismiss based on this issue granted. 730 F. Supp. 2d 1213 (2010).

To the extent plaintiffs argued that defendant was an
assignee, their claims failed because this section's liability did not attach
merely because, as plaintiff argued, defendant was an assignee. 773 F. Supp.
2d 886 (2011); 773 F. Supp. 2d 900 (2011).

Defendant resort's motion to dismiss plaintiff resort
employees' claim that defendant violated §481B-14, brought under this section,
granted where plaintiffs' allegations did not show the nature of the
competition or demonstrate that plaintiffs have suffered an antitrust injury;
Hawaii's requirement that a plaintiff assert the nature of the competition was
designed to serve the same purpose as the federal requirement that a plaintiff
assert an antitrust injury. 818 F. Supp. 2d 1240 (2010).

Plaintiff resort employees' claim, brought under this
section, that defendant resort violated §481B-14 was not preempted by §301 of
the Labor Management Relations Act, 29 U.S.C. §185(a), because the claim
regarding §481B-14 was a statutory claim that was independent from any
obligations created under the collective bargaining agreement (agreement)
between defendant and plaintiffs; further, resolution of the claim did not
require interpretation of the agreement and there was no clear and explicit
waiver of the plaintiffs' rights under §481B-14 in the agreement. 818 F. Supp.
2d 1240 (2010).

Plaintiff hotel employees' claim, brought pursuant to
§§481B-4 and 481B-14 and this section, was not preempted by §301 of the Labor
Management Relations Act, 29 U.S.C. §185(a) because plaintiffs were not
enforcing a right conferred only by the collective bargaining agreement
("agreement"), but rather an independent right conferred by state
law; resolution of plaintiffs' state law claim was not dependent on any
provision contained in the agreement and did not require interpretation of the
agreement. 835 F. Supp. 2d 914 (2011).

Plaintiffs' claim pursuant to §§481B-4 and 481B-14 and
this section dismissed because (1) they had not alleged harm to competition;
(2) merely alleging competition between hotels that result in lower prices did
not give rise to antitrust injury; (3) no authority to support plaintiffs
"competing" with defendant for tips, that there was a competitive
market that defendant was a part of for tips, or that defendant's actions
regarding service charges had a negative effect on that market; and (4)
statements that their injuries were "inextricably intertwined" with
defendant's acts did not establish that defendant caused any negative effect on
competition. 835 F. Supp. 2d 914 (2011).

Plaintiff borrowers' unfair and deceptive acts and practices
claim pursuant to subsection (a) dismissed where nothing in the complaint
indicated that any defendant "exceed[ed] the scope of [a] conventional
role as a mere lender of money". 836 F. Supp. 2d 1083 (2011).

To the extent that plaintiff trustee of decedent's trust
argued that defendants could be liable as assignees, plaintiff's claim still
failed because this section's liability did not attach "merely because one
is an assignee". 848 F. Supp. 2d 1182 (2012).

Defendant mortgagee and loan servicer's motion to dismiss
plaintiff mortgagor's claim pursuant to this section granted where plaintiff's
allegations appeared to sound at least partly in fraud, yet failed to meet
federal rule of civil procedure rule 9(b)'s particularity requirement;
specifically, where a chapter 480 claim is based on fraudulent acts, a
plaintiff must plead the claim with particularity. 850 F. Supp. 2d 1120
(2012).

Although a damage claim under §480-13 based on
violations of this section may only be asserted against the wrongdoer, a
rescission claim under chapter 480 can stand against subsequent assignees if
the contract is void; where plaintiff had alleged that defendant mortgage
broker assigned or sold loans to other defendants, plaintiff could seek
rescission against other defendants if mortgage broker violated chapter 480 and
the loans were void; however, a plaintiff seeking affirmatively to void a
mortgage transaction under §480-12 must "place the parties in as close a
position as they held prior to the transaction". 861 F. Supp. 2d 1153
(2012).

Count of plaintiffs' complaint failed to state a claim for a
violation of this section, where: (1) because of an alleged termination of a
mortgage participation certificates' trust, plaintiffs claimed that defendant
was also terminated as the mortgage loan servicer and wrongfully collected
mortgage loan payments from plaintiffs; and (2) plaintiffs did not assert
particularized allegations of the circumstances constituting fraud. 901 F.
Supp. 2d 1253 (2012).

The statement in §480-14(b) that the attorney general
"may bring a class action" is merely a recognition that the attorney
general has the discretion, as opposed to a statutory obligation, to bring a
parens patriae class action in response to violations of §480-2. 907 F. Supp.
2d 1188 (2012).

Where plaintiffs alleged that defendants engaged in various
unfair and deceptive acts or practices in connection with the loan origination,
including inducing plaintiffs to accept a loan product that plaintiffs could
not afford, plaintiffs' claims were time-barred and there was no genuine issue
of material fact as to the claim. 911 F. Supp. 2d 916 (2012).

Complexity of insurance policy, without more, does not make
document deceptive. 55 H. 155, 516 P.2d 720.

Federal statutes and decisions are to be used as guides. 63
H. 289, 627 P.2d 260.

Violation where financial institution failed to inform
parents with education plan, that it had a side deal with schools to pay
tuition in semiannual installments. 71 H. 285, 788 P.2d 833.

A broker or salesperson actively involved in a real estate
transaction engages in "conduct in any trade or commerce" and is thus
subject to liability under this chapter. 80 H. 54, 905 P.2d 29.

Where employee was not a "consumer" as defined
under §480-1, employee lacked standing to maintain private cause of action
under §480-13 against workers' compensation insurer based on alleged violation
of this section. 83 H. 457, 927 P.2d 858.

Where employer was not a "consumer" as defined
under §480-1, employee could not maintain action under §480-13, based on
employee's third party beneficiary status, against workers' compensation
insurer for alleged violation of this section. 83 H. 457, 927 P.2d 858.

There is no private claim for relief under §480-13 for unfair
methods of competition in violation of this section; private remedy is
restricted to claims of unfair or deceptive acts or practices. 91 H. 224, 982
P.2d 853.

Genuine issues of material fact precluded summary judgment
with respect to defendant's counterclaims based on alleged violation of this
section where defendants alleged that plaintiff credit union
"unethically" or "unscrupulously" attempted to influence
defendants to sign loan documents by making deceptive representations to
alleviate defendants' concerns that the mortgage interest rate was not that for
which they had bargained for. 94 H. 213, 11 P.3d 1.

By the plain language of this chapter, no actual purchase is
necessary as a prerequisite to a consumer recovering damages under §480-13,
based on injuries stemming from violations of this section. 98 H. 309, 47 P.3d
1222.

Under the filed-rate doctrine, telephone customers' claims
failed as a matter of law where customers could not demonstrate that telephone
company's allegedly inadequate disclosures constituted an unfair or deceptive
trade practice because (1) company's tariffs on file with the public utilities
commission disclosed that fees should be assessed against customers receiving
touch calling services; (2) knowledge of these disclosures contained in the
tariff was imputed to the customers, and, thus, (3) customers could prove
neither the injury nor the likelihood of damage that is required under this
section or chapter 481A. 109 H. 69, 123 P.3d 194.

Any person may bring a claim of unfair methods of competition
based upon conduct that could also support a claim of unfair or deceptive acts
or practices as long as the nature of the competition is sufficiently alleged
in the complaint. 113 H. 77, 148 P.3d 1179.

By its plain language, subsection (e) authorizes any person,
i.e., businesses and individual consumers, to bring an action grounded upon
unfair methods of competition; thus, trial court erred to the extent that it
premised its dismissal of plaintiffs' unfair methods of competition claims on
its conclusion that plaintiffs "are not competitors of defendant".
113 H. 77, 148 P.3d 1179.

Retroactive application of subsection (e), which created a
private claim for relief, is not permitted inasmuch as the legislature did not
expressly or obviously indicate its intention that subsection (e) apply
retroactively; thus, trial court correctly concluded that plaintiffs' claims of
unfair methods of competition based upon defendant's alleged wrongful acts
prior to the effective date of subsection (e) were barred. 113 H. 77, 148 P.3d
1179.

Under this section, plaintiffs need not be "in
competition" with defendant; thus, trial court erred to the extent that
its dismissal of plaintiffs' unfair methods of competition claims were premised
on its conclusion that plaintiffs "are not in competition with
defendant". 113 H. 77, 148 P.3d 1179.

Where unincorporated association of apartment owners was not
a "consumer" as defined by §480-1, it lacked standing to bring an
action based upon unfair or deceptive acts or practices declared unlawful by
this section. 115 H. 232, 167 P.3d 225.

Where unincorporated association of apartment owners was not
a "consumer" as defined by §480-1, it lacked standing to bring an action
based upon unfair or deceptive acts or practices declared unlawful by this
section. 115 H. 232, 167 P.3d 225.

Employees are "any persons" within the meaning of
§480-1 and subsection (e) and are within the category of plaintiffs who have
standing to bring a claim under subsection (e) for a violation of §481B-14;
however, based on the allegations contained in employees' amended complaint,
employees did not sufficiently allege the "nature of the competition"
to bring a claim for damages against employer under §480-13(a) and subsection
(e) for a violation of §481B-14. 122 H. 423, 228 P.3d 303 (2010).

Whether it was an unfair practice for creditor to threaten to
cut off business with debtor's employer unless debt was paid was a jury
question. 2 H. App. 301, 632 P.2d 1071.

Corporation committed unfair or deceptive acts by allowing
another to use its contractor's license and guaranteeing its own contractual
obligations; section does not supersede remedy for common law fraud. 6 H. App.
125, 712 P.2d 1148.

Unfair or deceptive trade practice claimed where defendants'
labels implied that foreign-made kukui nut leis were manufactured in Hawaii. 7
H. App. 600, 789 P.2d 501.

Evidence supported conclusion that person and corporation
owned and operated by person engaged in unfair and deceptive acts or practices
in publication of corporation's newspaper and television advertisements. 9 H.
App. 106, 826 P.2d 879.

In action by consumer under this section, "unclean
hands" of consumer not a defense to claim for damages under
§480-13(b)(1). 86 H. 405 (App.), 949 P.2d 1026.

The circuit court did not abuse its discretion in finding
that the superiority requirement under HRCP rule 23(b)(3) was met--that a class
action was superior to other available methods for the fair and efficient
adjudication of the controversy--where both the plaintiff's individual claim
and the class action hinged on whether the mortgagee's alleged act of
withholding information about its statement fee waiver policy constituted a
deceptive practice under this section. 122 H. 238 (App.), 225 P.3d 680 (2010).

Where mortgagee's alleged act of withholding information
about its statement fee waiver policy would predominate and form the basis for
plaintiff's individual claim and the class action under this section, the
circuit court did not abuse its discretion in finding that the predominance
requirement under HRCP rule 23(b)(3) was met. 122 H. 238 (App.), 225 P.3d 680
(2010).

Discussed: 903 F. Supp. 2d 1008 (2012); 907 F. Supp. 2d 1188
(2012).

Mentioned: 907 F. Supp. 2d 1165 (2012).

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next